Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Rifles and Shotguns

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d Weapons and Firearms §§ 7, 34.

Liability of one who provides, by sale or otherwise, firearm or ammunition to adult who shoots another, 39 ALR4th 517.

When has applicant for license under Gun Control Act of 1968 “willfully” violated statute or regulations within meaning of 18 USCS § 923(d)(1)(C), 59 ALR Fed 254.

94 C.J.S. Weapons §§ 3 to 8, 49.

§§ 6-8-301 through 6-8-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 66, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to the delivery, sale or purchase of rifles and shotguns to or from persons residing in contiguous states.